test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-jingkwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230602: Csilla)

  Verb - йиӈкве: # Verb 'to come' - full paradigm
    йиӈкве+V+Inf: йиӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: ювум
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: ювын
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: юв
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: ювме̄н
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [ювын, ювы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: ювыг
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: [ювув, ювӯв]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [ювын, ювы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: ювыт


#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: йисум
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: йисын
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: йис
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: йисуме̄н
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [йисын, йисы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [йисыг, йисы̄г]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [йисув, йисӯв]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [йисын, йисы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: йисыт


#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: [йинувум, йинӯвум]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: [йинувын, йинӯвын]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: йинув
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: йинуваме̄н
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [йинувын, йинувы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: [йинувыг, йинувы̄г]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: [йинувув, йинӯвӯв]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [йинувын, йинувы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: [йинувыт, йинувы̄т]


#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: яен
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [яен, яе̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [яен, яе̄н]


#Passive, present tense, indicative
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: йивем
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: йивен
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: йиве
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: йивеме̄н
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [йивен, йиве̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: йиве̄г
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: йиве̄в
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [йивен, йиве̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: йивет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: яйве̄сум
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: яйве̄сын
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [яйвес, яйве̄с]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: яйвесаме̄н # was яйвесеме̄н, but весеме̄н segment does not occur in corpus
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [яйвесын, яйвесы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: яйвесы̄г
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [яйвесув, яйвесӯв]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [яйвесын, яйвесы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: яйве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: [йинувем, йинӯвем]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: [йинувен, йинӯвен]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: [йинуве, йинӯве]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: йинувеме̄н
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [йинувен, йинуве̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: [йинувег, йинуве̄г]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: йинуве̄в
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [йинувен, йинуве̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: [йинувет, йинӯвет]

#Passive, imperative conjugation
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Sg2: [йивен, йиен]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Du2: [йивен, йиве̄н, йиен, йие̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Pl2: [йивен, йиве̄н, йиен, йие̄н]

#Present participle
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc: йинэ
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: йинэм
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: йинэн
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: йинэ̄тэ
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: йинэме̄н
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: йинэнэ̄н
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [йинэг, йинэ̄г]
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: йинэ̄в
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [йинэн, йинэ̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [йинэныл, йинэ̄ныл]

#Past participle
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc: йим
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg1: йимум
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg2: йимын
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxSg3: йиме
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu1: йимме̄н
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu2: [йимын, йимы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxDu3: [йимег, йиме̄г]
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl1: [йимув, йимӯв]
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl2: [йимын, йимы̄н]
    йиӈкве+V+PrfPrc+PxPl3: йимыт

#Gerund
    йиӈкве+V+Ger: йийим
    йиӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg1: йийимам
    йиӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg2: йийиман
    йиӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg3: [йийима, йийиматэ]
    йиӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu1: йийимаме̄н
    йиӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu2: йийиман
    йиӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu3: йийимаг
    йиӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl1: йийимав
    йиӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl2: йийиман
    йиӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl3: йийимат

#Privative
    йиӈкве+V+VAbess: йимтал
